California, session 20252026, AB2266.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature to do all of the following:(1) Ensure alignment of resource valuation methods across electricity supply procurement programs to improve efficiency in regulatory implementation processes to meet the short-term, midterm, and long-term reliability needs of the state.(2) Improve information and transparency by consolidating compliance reporting requirements to facilitate improved stakeholder participation and regulatory decisionmaking.(3) Minimize the state’s reliance on backstop procurement mechanisms through continuously improving interagency coordination to position the state for effective participation in a regional energy market.(b) It is not the intent of the Legislature to prescribe any specific technical method or compliance structure, but to ensure consistency and close alignment between multiple programs affecting ratepayer cost.SEC. 2. Section 380.9 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to immediately follow immediately following Section 380.5, to read:380.9. (a) On and after January 1, 2030, the commission shall, when setting resource adequacy and resource procurement obligations for load-serving entities pursuant to Sections 380 and 454.52, use the same capacity valuation method to assess the reliability contribution of each resource type to ensure consistent short-term, midterm, and long-term reliability outlooks.(b) On or before January 1, 2030, the commission shall initiate complete a process to consolidate compliance reporting for load-serving entities for programs established pursuant to Sections 380, 399.15, and 454.52 into a single compliance reporting process. plans submitted by load-serving entities to the commission pursuant to Sections 399.15 and 454.52 into a single procurement plan. The commission shall, when feasible, consolidate compliance reporting for reliability requirements established pursuant to Sections 380 and 454.52.(c) Any compliance reporting requirements or template issued by the commission to ensure compliance with Sections 380, 399.15, and 454.52 shall be finalized for a minimum of 20 calendar 30 business days before a compliance report submission by a load-serving entity.(d) If the Independent System Operator exercises its backstop procurement authority to ensure sufficient resources to operate the electrical grid in a calendar year, the commission shall include in its public report pursuant to Section 380 for that calendar year an explanation of whether the backstop procurement need arose due to any noncompliance by load-serving entities or due to differences in methodology between the commission and the Independent System Operator in assessing the reliability contribution of different resource types.(e) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:(1) “Capacity valuation method” means the method used to quantify the reliability contribution that a resource provides to the grid.(2) “Load-serving entity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 380.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.